Utah statutes.
9-4-609.   Powers of housing authority.
(1)  Each authority shall have perpetual succession and all the powers
necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and
provisions of this part.
(2)  Any authority may:
(a)  sue and be sued;
(b)  have a seal and alter it;
(c)  make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient
to the exercise of its powers;
(d)  make, amend, and repeal bylaws and rules;
(e)  within its area of operation, prepare, carry out, and operate projects
and provide for the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation,
improvement, extension, alteration or repair of any project;
(f)  undertake and carry out studies and analyses of housing needs within its
area of operation and ways of meeting these needs, including data with respect
to population and family groups and its distribution according to income
groups, the amount and quality of available housing, including accessible
housing, and its distribution according to rentals and sales prices,
employment, wages and other factors affecting the local housing needs and
meeting these needs;
(g)  make the results of studies and analyses available to the public and the
building, housing, and supply industries and engage in research and
disseminate information on housing programs;
(h)  utilize, contract with, act through, assist, and cooperate or deal with
any person, agency, institution, or organization, public or private, for the
provision of services, privileges, works, or facilities, or in connection with
its projects;
(i)  notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this part or in any
other provision of law, agree to any conditions attached to federal financial
assistance relating to the determination of prevailing salaries or wages or
payment of not less than prevailing salaries or wages or compliance with labor
standards in the development or administration of projects, include in any
contract awarded or entered into in connection with a project stipulations
requiring that the contractor and all subcontractors comply with requirements
as to minimum salaries or wages and maximum hours of labor, and comply with
any conditions attached to the financial aid of the project;
(j)  lease, rent, sell, or lease with option to purchase any dwellings, lands,
buildings, structures, or facilities embraced in any project;
(k)  subject to the limitations contained in this part with respect to the
rental or charges for dwellings in housing projects, establish and revise the
rents or charges therefor;
(l)  own, hold, and improve real or personal property;
(m)  purchase, lease, obtain options upon, acquire by gift, grant, bequest,
devise, or otherwise any real or personal property or any interest in it;
(n)  sell, lease, exchange, transfer, assign, pledge, or dispose of any real
or personal property or any interest in it;
(o)  make loans for the provision of housing for occupancy by persons of
medium and low income;
(p)  make loans or grants for the development and construction of accessible
housing;
(q)  insure or provide for the insurance, in stock or mutual companies, of any
real or personal property or operations of the authority against any risks or
hazards;
(r)  procure or agree to the procurement of government insurance or guarantees
of the payment of any bonds, in whole or in part, issued by the authority,
including the power to pay premiums on any insurance;
(s)  invest any funds held in reserves, sinking funds, or any funds not
required for immediate disbursement in property or securities in which savings
banks may legally invest funds subject to their control;
(t)  redeem its bonds at the redemption price established or purchase its
bonds at less than redemption price, with all bonds so redeemed or purchased
to be canceled;
(u)  within its area of operation, determine where blighted areas exist or
where there is unsafe, insanitary, or overcrowded housing;
(v)  make studies and recommendations relating to the problem of clearing,
replanning, and reconstructing blighted areas, and the problem of eliminating
unsafe, insanitary, or overcrowded housing and providing dwelling
accommodations and maintaining a wholesome living environment for persons of
medium and low income, and cooperate with any public body or the private
sector in action taken in connection with those problems;
(w)  acting through one or more commissioners or other persons designated by
the authority, conduct examinations and investigations and hear testimony and
take proof under oath at public or private hearings on any matter material for
its information;
(x)  administer oaths, issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses
or the production of books and papers, and  issue commissions for the
examination of witnesses outside the state who are unable to appear before the
authority or are excused from attendance;
(y)  make available to appropriate agencies, including those charged with the
duty of abating or requiring the correction of nuisances or like conditions or
of demolishing unsafe or insanitary structures within its area of operation,
its findings and recommendations with regard to any building or property where
conditions exist that are dangerous to the public health, morals, safety, or
welfare; and
(z)  exercise all or any part or combination of the powers granted under this
part.
(3)  No provision of law with respect to the acquisition, operation, or
disposition of property by other public bodies is applicable to an authority
unless the Legislature specifically states that it is.
